Utah statutes.
31A-22-640.   Insurer and pharmacy benefit management services -- Audit restrictions.

(1)  For purposes of this section "pharmacy benefits manager or coordinator" means a person or entity that provides pharmacy benefit management services as defined in Section 49-20-502 on behalf of an insurer as defined in Subsection 31A-22-636(1).

(2)  An insurer and an insurer's pharmacy benefits manager or coordinator is subject to the pharmacy audit provisions of Section 58-17b-622.



Enacted by Chapter 265, 2012 General Session

